Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1804.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protect Pennsylvanians Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." An association, authority, board, department, commission, independent agency, institution, office or other body in State government created or authorized to be created by the Constitution or any law, including the General Assembly and the courts."Personally identifiable information." Information that can be associated with a particular individual through one or more identifiers or other information or circumstances."Treasurer." The State Treasurer of the Commonwealth.CHAPTER 3FEDERAL MONEY WITHHOLDING AND APPROPRIATIONSection 301. Report of treasurer.(a) Duty of treasurer.--The treasurer shall create a report and submit the report to the Governor, the Chief Clerk of the 20250HB1804PN2218 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives for distribution to the members of the legislature no more than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection. The report shall include:(1) Federal money owed to the Commonwealth when the Federal Government's nonpayment is in contravention of a court decision.(2) Money the treasurer projects will be due to be paid by the Commonwealth to the Federal Government during the succeeding 12 months, including Federal taxes owed by the Commonwealth as an employer, Federal employment taxes withheld by the Commonwealth on behalf of the Federal Government, offsets for Federal debts, backup withholding of Federal taxes and Federal grant repayments.(b) Update to report.--The treasurer shall update the report compiled under subsection (a) monthly.Section 302. Withholding Federal money.Following issuance of a report under section 301, if there is Federal money owed to the Commonwealth in contravention of a court decision, the Governor, the treasurer and the Secretary of the Budget, acting jointly and unanimously, may direct the Secretary of Revenue to withhold payments to the Federal Government. The total amount withheld shall not exceed the amount of Federal money owed to the Commonwealth in contravention of a court decision as described in the report under section 301.Section 303. Amount of withholding.Money held pursuant to section 302 shall be made available for appropriation as State money. The appropriations under this section may not exceed the amount of Federal money owed to the 20250HB1804PN2218 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth in contravention of a court decision as described under section 301(a)(2).CHAPTER 5LIENS ON FEDERAL PROPERTYSection 501. Duty of treasurer.If the treasurer determines that Federal money was authorized under an act of Congress and is being withheld under an executive order of the President of the United States or in contravention of a court order, the treasurer shall:(1) Determine the approximate amount of Federal money the Commonwealth is being or is expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the court order.(2) Not later than 60 days after the date of the executive order or court order, submit to the Governor and to the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives a report that:(i) Describes in detail the amount of Federal money the Commonwealth is being or is expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the court order, as determined under this section.(ii) Identifies properties located in this Commonwealth that are owned by the Federal Government.(3) Submit a notice requesting that the Attorney General obtain a lien on one or more properties identified under paragraph (2)(ii) in a total amount not to exceed the approximate amount of Federal money the Commonwealth is being or is expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the court order.Section 502. Duty of Attorney General.20250HB1804PN2218 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Attorney General shall obtain a lien on the Federal property identified under section 501 in the Attorney General's official capacity.CHAPTER 7DATA PROTECTIONSection 701. Prohibited data sharing.(a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b), an agency may not share with any Federal official or agency data containing personally identifiable information unless the data is first masked or otherwise anonymized.(b) Exceptions.--(1) An agency may share personally identifiable information with a Federal official or agency to the extent necessary to comply with Federal or State law or to carry out the administration of a Federal or State program.(2) A member of the General Assembly may share personally identifiable information with a Federal official or agency to the extent necessary to carry out constituent relations or the member's official duties.(3) A court may share personally identifiable information with a Federal official or agency to the extent necessary to carry out the court's official duties.Section 702. Actions for violations.A person who negligently violates section 701 shall be liable to any person injured as a result of the violation for actual damages to that person, exemplary damages of not more than $1,000 and costs and reasonable actual attorney fees.CHAPTER 9MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Private right of action.20250HB1804PN2218 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Cause of action.--An individual who has been deprived of any due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of the United States or Federal law, or any rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of Pennsylvania or the laws of this Commonwealth, by a person acting under the color of law, or whose exercise or enjoyment of those rights, privileges or immunities has been interfered with or attempted to be interfered with, by threats, intimidation or coercion by a person acting under the color of law, may bring a cause of action or suit against another person, including the Commonwealth or agency, for damages and for injunctive or other appropriate relief.(b) Attorney fees.--In addition to any damages or injunctive or other appropriate relief awarded to a prevailing plaintiff in an action under this section, the court shall award the prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and costs.(c) Statute of limitations.--An action under this section must be commenced within six years after the alleged violation of this act.Section 902. Applicability.This act shall apply to causes of action accruing on or after the effective date of this section.Section 903. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1804PN2218 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425